California, session 20252026, SB1018.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as Blair and Kendra’s Law.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 13822 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13822. (a) The Office of Emergency Services shall administer a grant program for the benefit of survivors of human trafficking. Grants shall be awarded from the Survivors of Human Trafficking License Plate Fund. The Office of Emergency Services shall accept donations to the fund on its internet website.(b) The grants shall be awarded to community-based organizations that are led by survivors of human trafficking or that are guided by substantial survivor input and that provide direct services to vulnerable individuals in areas with a high concentration of human trafficking.(c) In awarding grants, the Office of Emergency Services shall establish a balanced regional distribution of funds.(d) The Office of Emergency Services shall, by no later than January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, report to the Legislature the amount of revenues received into the Survivors of Human Trafficking License Plate Fund, the amount of each grant, and the identity of each recipient. A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 5156.6 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:5156.6. (a) The Office of Emergency Services shall apply to the department to sponsor a human trafficking awareness license plate program pursuant to this article.(b) The fees specified in Section 5157 shall be imposed for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of specialized license plates authorized by this section. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 5157, after deducting its administrative costs, the department shall deposit the revenue derived from the additional fees into the Survivors of Human Trafficking License Plate Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in that fund shall be allocated to the Office of Emergency Services for the purpose of funding the survivors of human trafficking grant program described in Section 13822 of the Penal Code.(c) The department shall accept donations to the Survivors of Human Trafficking License Plate Fund on its internet website without requiring the purchase of a specialized license plate.